Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.001

Actions subject to review by boundary review board.

The creation of a metropolitan park district, and an annexation by, or dissolution or disincorporation of, a metropolitan park district may be subject to potential review by a boundary review board under chapter 36.93 RCW.

[ 1989 c 84 s 31.]